dictsource/sq_rules
// translation rules for Albanian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
//
// Phonemes are defined in phsource/ph_albanian.
// Stress and number options are in src/libespeak-ng/tr_languages.c, case L('s','q').
//
// Albanian spelling is nearly phonemic.  The alphabet has 36 letters, nine of
// which are digraphs (dh gj ll nj rr sh th xh zh); a digraph rule outscores the
// rule for its first letter, so both live in the same .group.
//
// Stress is placed by tr_languages.c on the last syllable, or on the
// penultimate one when the word ends in a vowel.  Inflectional endings which
// must not take the stress are listed here with '=' (put the primary stress on
// the preceding syllable); endings which must take it carry an explicit '.

.replace
// Letters from other alphabets, and characters used instead of ë and ç.
	ǝ	ë
	ə	ë
	ê	e	// long/open e of older and Gheg spelling
	ć	ç
	č	ç
	ĉ	ç
	à	a
	á	a
	â	a
	ã	a
	ä	a
	å	a
	è	e
	é	e
	ě	e
	ì	i
	í	i
	î	i
	ï	i
	ı	i
	ò	o
	ó	o
	ô	o
	õ	o
	ö	o
	ø	o
	ù	u
	ú	u
	û	u
	ü	y
	ý	y
	ÿ	y
	ğ	g
	ř	r
	ń	nj
	ñ	nj
	ś	sh
	š	sh
	ș	sh
	ź	zh
	ž	zh
	ż	zh
	đ	dh
	ð	dh
	þ	th
	ł	ll
	ß	ss

.L02 b d g gj xh
.L03 dh gj ll nj rr sh th xh zh   // 2-letter consonants

.group a
        a        a
        aj (_    aI      // ndaj, maj, vaj
        aj (K    aI
     @) ai (_    'aI      // vëllai, ai
        ai (_    aI
        a (_     A   // if stressed
        a (rK    A

     @) at (_    =at      // librat, fushat
     @) ash (_   =aS      // librash
     @) ave (_   =avE     // librave
     @) ani (q_  'ani     // -aniq (Slavic surnames)

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        ts
        c (C     k        // Albanian never spells "c"+consonant: Cristiano, klub, credit
        ch       c        // English "ch" → q: check, check-in
        ch (C    k        // ... but "ch"+consonant is Greek/Latin: Christian, chrom
        ck       k        // English "ck" → k: ticket, check

.group ç
        ç        tS

.group d
        d        d
        dh       D

.group e
        e        E
     j) e        e
     q) e        e
     l) e        e
    ll) e        E
    sh) e        e
        e (j     e
        ej (K    eI
        e (sh    e
        e (sj    e

     @) em (_    =Em      // lahem, ulem
     @) en (_    =En
     @) es (_    =Es      // mësues
     @) esh (_   =ES      // lahesh, vendesh
     @) et (_    =Et      // vendet, punimet
     @) eve (_   =EvE     // vendeve
     @) evi (q_  'Evi     // -eviq (Slavic surnames)

.group ë
        ë        V
    AC) ë (_     @/    // reduced word-final schwa: dritë, plotë
   ACC) ë (_     @/    // ... after a cluster: ftohtë, mbushët
  ACCC) ë (_     @/    // ... after a longer cluster
     @) ë (X     %V    // unstressed in a final closed syllable: i dobishëm
     @) ë (CA    %V    // unstressed between syllables: njerëzit, punëtor
     @) ë (CCA   %V    // ... ëmbëlsirë, përkëdhel
     @) ë (Cve   =@    // njerëzve, shpirtërve
     @) ë (CCCA  =%@   // qumështi, qumështit

     @) ëra (_   =@Ra     // ujëra
     @) ërat (_  =@Rat
     @) ërash (_ =@RaS
     @) ërave (_ =@RavE
     @) ëse (_   =@sE     // larëse
     @) ësh (_   =@S      // gjuhësh
     @) ësi (_   =@si     // çelësi, nxënësi (abstract nouns in -ësi are in sq_list)
     @) ësia (_  @s'ia
     @) ësin (_  =@sIn
     @) ësit (_  =@sIt    // nxënësit
     @) ësve (_  =@svE    // nxënësve
     @) ësisht (_ @s'ISt  // miqësisht
     @) ëta (_   =@ta
     @) ëve (_   =@vE     // gjuhëve
     @) ëvi (q_  =@vi

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        gj       dZ;

.group h
        h        h
        h (_     hh

.group i
        i        i
        ie (_    iE      // shmangie, rënie, shtie
        ie (n_   'iE     // shmangien
        ie (s_   'iE     // shmangies
        ie (sh_  'iE     // shmangiesh
        ie (ve_  'iE     // shmangieve
        ie       je      // diell, miell, klient

   @ic) i (_     'i
   @ër) i (_     'i       // shoqëri, mjeshtëri
     @) in (_    =In      // librin, punimin
     @) i (q_    =i       // -iq (Slavic surnames)
     @) i (t_    =I       // librit, vendit
     @) i (sh_   'i       // shtëpish, fotografish: the -i base is end-stressed
        i (un_   'i

     @) itet (_    it'Et    // -itet is always end-stressed: imunitet, identitet
     @) iteti (_   it'Eti
     @) itetin (_  it'Etin
     @) itetit (_  it'EtIt
     @) itetet (_  it'EtEt
     @) iteteve (_ it'EtEvE

.group j
        j        j

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        L
        ll       ll

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        nj       n^
        n (g     N        // këngë, ngjyrë
        n (k     N

.group o
        o        O
        oj (K    OI
        oi (l_   OI
        ovi (q_  'Ovi     // -oviq (Slavic surnames)
     @) ove (_   =OvE

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        c

.group r
        r        R
        r (K     R
        rr       RR2

.group s
        s        s
        sh       S

//   L02) sh       @-S     // epenthetic

.group t
        t        t
        th       T

.group u
        u        u
        ua       wA   // diphthong ??
        u (ajK   w
        u (an_   'u       // punuan
        u (ar_   'u       // punuar
        u (ara_  'u       // të punuara
        u (esve_ 'u
     @) u (n_    =u       // vëllaun
     @) u (r_    =u       // hapur, flutur
     @) ura (_   =uRa     // të hapura
     @) uve (_   =uvE
     @) ull (_   =ull     // popull, shembull, rregull, titull
     @) ulla (_  =ulla    // rregulla
     @) ullash (_ =ullaS
     @) ullat (_ =ullat
     @) ullave (_ =ullavE
     @) ulli (_  =ulli    // populli, kapitulli
     @) ullin (_ =ullin
     @) ullit (_ =ullit
     @) ullve (_ =ullvE

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        dz
        xh       dZ
        x (_     ks

.group y
        y        y
        ye       yE    // diphthong

.group z
        z        z
        zh       Z


.group
	$	dOll'aR
